Massachusetts, session 194th, H4936.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 22 of Chapter 32A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the last paragraph, and inserting in place
thereof the following paragraph:-
For the purposes of this section, “licensed mental health professional” shall mean a
licensed physician who specializes in the practice of psychiatry, a licensed psychologist, a
licensed independent clinical social worker, a licensed mental health counselor, a licensed nurse
mental health clinical specialist, or a licensed educational psychologist within the lawful scope of
practice for such educational psychologist.
SECTION 2. Section 47B of Chapter 175, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking
out the second paragraph of subsection (i) and inserting in place thereof the following
paragraph:-
For the purposes of this section, “licensed mental health professional” shall mean a
licensed physician who specializes in the practice of psychiatry, a licensed psychologist, a
of 3

licensed independent clinical social worker, a licensed mental health counselor, a licensed nurse
mental health clinical specialist, or a licensed educational psychologist within the lawful scope of
practice for such educational psychologist.
SECTION 3. Section 8A of Chapter 176A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the second paragraph of subsection (i) and
inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-
For the purposes of this section, “licensed mental health professional” shall mean a
licensed physician who specializes in the practice of psychiatry, a licensed psychologist, a
licensed independent clinical social worker, a licensed mental health counselor, a licensed nurse
mental health clinical specialist, or a licensed educational psychologist within the lawful scope of
practice for such educational psychologist.
SECTION 4. Section 4A of Chapter 176B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out the second paragraph of subsection (i) and inserting in place thereof the following
paragraph:-
For the purposes of this section, “licensed mental health professional” shall mean a
licensed physician who specializes in the practice of psychiatry, a licensed psychologist, a
licensed independent clinical social worker, a licensed mental health counselor, a licensed nurse
mental health clinical specialist, or a licensed educational psychologist within the lawful scope of
practice for such educational psychologist.
SECTION 5. Section 4M of Chapter 176G of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the second paragraph of subsection (i), and
inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-
of 3

For the purposes of this section, “licensed mental health professional” shall mean a
licensed physician who specializes in the practice of psychiatry, a licensed psychologist, a
licensed independent clinical social worker, a licensed mental health counselor, a licensed nurse
mental health clinical specialist, or a licensed educational psychologist within the lawful scope of
practice for such educational psychologist.
of 3